Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1147.
do enact as follows:AB1147,11Section 1. 16.75 (10p) of the statutes is repealed.AB1147,22Section 2. 16.75 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1147,2,11316.75 (1) (a) 1. All orders awarded or contracts made by the department for all 4materials, supplies, equipment, and contractual services to be provided to any 5agency, except as otherwise provided in par. (c) and subs. (2), (2g), (2m), (3m), (3t), 6(6), (7), (8), (9), (10e), and (10m), and (10p) and ss. 16.705 (1r), 16.73 (4) (a), 16.751, 716.754, 50.05 (7) (f), 153.05 (2m) (a), 165.987, and 287.15 (7), shall be awarded to 8the lowest responsible bidder, taking into consideration life cycle cost estimates 9under sub. (1m), when appropriate, the location of the agency, the quantities of the 10articles to be supplied, their conformity with the specifications, and the purposes 11for which they are required and the date of delivery.AB1147,312Section 3. 20.931 of the statutes is repealed.AB1147,413Section 4. 781.10 (2) (c) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1147,2,1614781.10 (2) (c) 6. To the extent authorized by law, a state agency, as defined in 15s. 20.931 (1) (c) 16.9565 (1) (d), that is aggrieved by the final decision on the 16application for approval.AB1147,2,1717